Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2910.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; FAMILY TREE CLINIC.new text end new text begin $1,575,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,575,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for a grant to the Family Tree Clinic to provide health services, educational outreach, and workforce training for culturally competent care. new text end